Washington statutes.
RCW 35.107.090

Joint legislative audit and review committee report. (Expires December 31, 2028.)

(1) The joint legislative audit and review committee must study the effectiveness of the local sales and use tax remittance and the local property tax reinvestment programs authorized in this chapter, and submit a report as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(2) The report must include, but is not limited to, an assessment of the local sales and use tax remittance and the property tax reinvestment programs authorized under this chapter and an evaluation of:

(a) The availability of quality office space;

(b) The effects on affordable housing;

(c) The effects on transportation, traffic congestion, and greenhouse gas emissions; and

(d) Job creation.

(3) By October 1, 2028, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the joint legislative audit and review committee must submit to the appropriate committees of the legislature a final report with their findings and recommendations under this section.

(4) This section expires December 31, 2028.

[ 2019 c 273 s 10.]